Tennessee statutes. Title 65 Public Utilities and Carriers
Part 2

Subcontractor's Lien Against Railroad

65-10-201. Direct lien against railroad authorized.

Every subcontractor, laborer, materialman, or other person who performs any part of the work in grading any railroad company's roadway, or who constructs or aids in the construction or repairs of its culverts and bridges, or furnishes cross-ties or masonry or bridge timbers for the same, which is used in the building and construction of such railroad, its bridges and culverts, or who lays or aids in the laying of its track, building of its bridges, the erection of its depots, platforms, wood or water stations, section houses, machine shops, or other buildings, or for the delivery of material for any of these purposes, or for any engineering or superintendence, or who performs any valuable service, manual or professional, by which any such railroad company receives a benefit, all and every such person or persons at election shall have a direct lien on such railroad, its franchises and property, for the value of such work and labor done or material furnished or services rendered as set out and specified, in as full and ample a manner as is provided by § 65-10-101, for persons contracting directly with such railroad company for any such work and labor done or for materials furnished.

Acts 1891, ch. 98, § 1; Shan., § 3580; mod. Code 1932, § 8002; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-1011.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 18 Tenn. Juris., Mechanics' Liens, § 12; 21 Tenn. Juris., Railroads, § 55.

Law Reviews.

Creditor's Rights and Security Transactions — 1956 Tennessee Survey (Paul J. Hartman), 9 Vand. L. Rev. 965 (1956).

65-10-202. Notice to secure lien.

To secure this direct lien, such subcontractor, laborer, materialman, or other person rendering the labor or service, shall, within ninety (90) days after such work and labor is done or completed, or such materials are furnished, or such services are rendered, notify, in writing, any such railroad company, or the owners of such railroad, should it or they reside in the state, or its or their agents or attorneys, should it or they be beyond the limit of the state, that the lien is claimed, specifying in the face of the notice the character of the work and labor done or services rendered, or materials furnished, and the value of such labor, services or materials.

Acts 1891, ch. 98, § 1; Shan., § 3581; mod. Code 1932, § 8003; T.C.A (orig. ed.), § 65-1012.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 21 Tenn. Juris., Railroads, § 58.

65-10-203. Duration of lien.

Such lien shall continue for the space of one (1) year from the service of the notice, and until the termination of any suit, commenced for the enforcement within one (1) year; and the lien shall have priority over all other liens on such railroad, its property and franchises.

Acts 1891, ch. 98, § 1; Shan., § 3582; mod. Code 1932, § 8004; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-1013.

65-10-204. Jurisdiction to enforce lien.

The liens provided for in § 65-10-201 may be enforced by suit brought against such railroad company in the circuit or chancery court of the county where the work or material, or any part thereof, was done or furnished, or any part of the services was rendered.

Acts 1891, ch. 98, § 2; Shan., § 3583; Code 1932, § 8005; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-1014.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Circuit Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 241 (1978).

65-10-205. Pleadings.

The declaration or bill, as the case may be, of a plaintiff or complainant shall set out with reasonable certainty, the work done, services rendered, or materials furnished, the amount claimed therefor, the nature and substance of any contract made with such railroad company, or any contractor or construction company, or subcontractor, as the case may be, accompanying such declaration or bill with a copy of the notice, executed as required in § 65-10-202.

Acts 1891, ch. 98, § 3; Shan., § 3584; mod. Code 1932, § 8006; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-1015.

65-10-206. Priority of lien.

No railroad company shall have power to give or create any mortgage or other kind of lien on its railroad, its property or franchises, in this state, which shall be valid and binding against any judgments or decrees, or execution issued thereon, rendered in any of the courts in this state, for the enforcement of any liens provided for in this chapter; nor shall the liens created by § 65-10-201 be hindered, postponed, delayed or defeated by any contract, real or pretended, made by any railroad company with any principal or construction company, real or pretended.

Acts 1891, ch. 98, § 4; Shan., § 3585; Code 1932, § 8007; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-1016.

Cross-References. Lien of state for construction of overpass or underpass, priority, § 65-11-109.

Priority of judgments for timbers, work, or damages to person or property over other liens, § 65-10-112.

Sale of property and franchise under judgment, § 65-8-107.

65-10-207. Indemnity bond — Judgment by motion.

Any such railroad company shall have the right to demand from any principal contractor or construction company an indemnity or refunding bond to protect it in case of the enforcement of the liens created by § 65-10-201; and in case any original contractor or construction company is paid for work done or material furnished, or any part of it, covered by this part, and such original contractor or construction company should fail to pay any subcontractor, laborer, or materialman, for work done or material furnished, as specified in § 65-10-201, then, upon the payment of such subcontractor, laborer, or materialman of the amount due, such railroad company shall have judgment, by motion, for such amount so paid on such bond in court; but any contractor or construction company shall have the right to intervene and contest the claim of such subcontractor, laborer, or materialman claiming to be employed by such contractor or construction company.

Acts 1891, ch. 98, § 5; Shan., § 3586; mod. Code 1932, § 8008; T.C.A. § 65-1017.